Maine, session 132, LD218.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶C, as enacted by PL 1981, c. 693, §§5 and
8, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §5205, sub-§6, ¶C-1 is enacted to read:
C-1. A transfer approved under this subsection must continue to be considered in the
best interest of the student and must be automatically renewed on an annual basis unless
the superintendent of the school administrative unit to which the student transferred
determines that:
(1) The student's attendance is irregular;
(2) The student is disruptive in class, at school or at school activities;
(3) The student does not use best efforts to succeed in class; or
(4) Based on the available facts, data and evidence, the transfer is no longer in the
best interest of the student.
If a superintendent makes a determination under this paragraph, the superintendent of
the school administrative unit from which the student transferred and the
superintendent of the school administrative unit to which the student transferred shall
review the transfer and the transfer may be discontinued. If a determination is made to
discontinue the transfer, the superintendent of the school administrative unit to which
the student was transferred shall notify the student and the student's parent of the
determination and the facts, evidence and data used to make the determination. At the
request of a parent, a determination to discontinue the transfer may be reviewed by the
commissioner under paragraph B.